Hawaii statutes.
§145-11 Nuisance may be enjoined, abated.
Violation of this chapter is declared a public nuisance and may be enjoined or
abated in like manner as other public nuisances. [L 1951, c 74, pt of §1; RL
1955, §23-11; HRS §145-11]

Rules of Court

Injunction, see HRCP
rule 65.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next